src/fst/morphology/stems/ojibwe_verbs.lexc
LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_am_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+1SgSubj:anziiwaanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2PlSubj:anziiwegwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+2SgSubj:anziiwanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlObvSubj:anziinigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3PlProxSubj:anziiwaagwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgObvSubj:anziinigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+3SgProxSubj:anziigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+ExclSubj:anziiwaangen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+InclSubj:anziiwangen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Dub+XSubj:anziiwiingen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+1SgSubj:amowaambaanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2PlSubj:amowegibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+2SgSubj:amowambanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlObvSubj:aminigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj:amowaagobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgObvSubj:aminigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+3SgProxSubj:amogobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+ExclSubj:amowaangibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+InclSubj:amowangibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+DubPrt+XSubj:amowiingibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+1SgSubj:anziwaan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2PlSubj:anziweg EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+2SgSubj:anziwan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj:anzinid EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlObvSubj:anzinig EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3PlProxSubj:anzigwaa EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObvSubj:anzinid EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgObvSubj:anzinig EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+3SgProxSubj:anzig EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+ExclSubj:anziwaang EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+InclSubj:anziwang EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Neu+XSubj:anzing EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+1SgSubj:anziwaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2PlSubj:anziwegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+2SgSubj:anziwamban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlObvSubj:anzinigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3PlProxSubj:anzigwaaban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgObvSubj:anzinigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+3SgProxSubj:anzigoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+ExclSubj:anziwaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+InclSubj:anziwangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Neg+Prt+XSubj:anzingiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+1SgSubj:amowaanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2PlSubj:amowegwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+2SgSubj:amowanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlObvSubj:aminigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3PlProxSubj:amowaagwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgObvSubj:aminigwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+3SgProxSubj:amogwen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+ExclSubj:amowaangen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+InclSubj:amowangen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Dub+XSubj:amowiingen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+1SgSubj:amowaambaanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2PlSubj:amowegibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+2SgSubj:amowambanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlObvSubj:aminigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3PlProxSubj:amowaagobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgObvSubj:aminigobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+3SgProxSubj:amogobanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+ExclSubj:amowaangibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+InclSubj:amowangibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+DubPrt+XSubj:amowiingibanen EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+1SgSubj:amaan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2PlSubj:ameg EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+2SgSubj:aman EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlObvSubj:aminid EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3PlProxSubj:amowaad EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgObvSubj:aminid EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+3SgProxSubj:ang EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+ExclSubj:amaang EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+InclSubj:amang EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Neu+XSubj:aming EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+1SgSubj:amaambaan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj:amegiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2PlSubj:amegoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+2SgSubj:amamban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlObvSubj:aminipan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3PlProxSubj:amowaapan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgObvSubj:aminipan EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+3SgProxSubj:angiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+ExclSubj:amaangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj:amangiban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+InclSubj:amangoban EncliticRoot ;
+VAI+Cnj+Pos+Prt+XSubj:amingiban EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_m                                          !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary
+VAI+Der/magad:0%>%>oomagad VII_Class=VII_d_Boundary ;
0:%>%> VAI_Class=VAI_m_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_m                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_m_Flags
@R.Prefix.%<CHCNJ%>@ VAI_Class=VAI_m_Flags_Prefix=%<CHCNJ%> ;
@R.Prefix.GAA-@ VAI_Class=VAI_m_Flags_Prefix=GAA- ;
@R.Prefix.GI@ VAI_Class=VAI_m_Flags_Prefix=GI ;
@R.Prefix.NI@ VAI_Class=VAI_m_Flags_Prefix=NI ;
@R.Prefix.NONE@ VAI_Class=VAI_m_Flags_Prefix=NONE ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_m                                          !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Class=VAI_m_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Cnj@ VAI_Class=VAI_m_Prefix=NONE_Order=Cnj_Endings ;
@U.Order.Ind@ VAI_Class=VAI_m_Prefix=NONE_Order=Ind_Endings ;
@U.Order.Other@ VAI_Class=VAI_m_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: VAI, Class: VAI_m, Prefix: NONE, Order: Cnj                !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON VAI_Stems
aanzingwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
aapidingwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
biingengwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
biinisibwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
biitoongwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
biningwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
boogidingwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
boozaangwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
bwaanzhii-niimi'idim VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
daawanoongwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
daningwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
dewikwengwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
diba'amaadim:diba'amaadi VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
gaagiigidongwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
gaagiijibwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
gagiibaaji-doodam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
gagiigidoongwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
gagweyaada'odi=m:gagweyaada'odi VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
giiwanaadingwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
giizhoongwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
gwekendam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
inwewidam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
maadingwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
maajaa'idim VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
maajingwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
maazhingwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
madwengwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
mamaadwengwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
mamakii'idim:mamakii'idi VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
maminwendam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
mashkawingwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
mawingwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
miidingwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
miigaadim VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
minongwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
moosem VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
naawashkiiga'am VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
nandawadaandim VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
nandokwam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
niisaanendam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
nisidawendam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
ombiigwewengwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
onji'idim VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
onzaamingwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
waabanoo-niimi'idim VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
wakewiingwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
wanishkweyendam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
wiikwandim:wiikwandi VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
wiiwim VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
wiizhaandim:wiizhaandi=m VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
zaagidinidim:zaagidinidi VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
zagaswe'idim VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
zhigingwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
zoongingwaam VAI_Class=VAI_m_Boundary ;
